District of Columbia statutes.
47-2851.03b

Unique identifying number.

To the extent feasible, and dependent on the available technology needed for implementation, each business licensed pursuant to this subchapter shall have a unique identifying number that shall be used for all official purposes, including taxation.

History

Apr. 20, 1999, D.C. Law 12-261, § 2002(f), 46 DCR 3142

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 47-2851.3b.

Short Title

Short title of title II of Law 12-261: See Historical and Statutory Notes following § 47-2851.03a.